Rhode Island statutes. Title 6 Commercial Law — General Regulatory Provisions
Chapter 32 Lay-Away Sales

6-32-1.
“Lay-away sales” defined.

As used in this chapter, “lay-away sales” means any sale of goods in which the goods are offered for sale to the public on terms that permit periodic payment for the goods and with respect to which delivery is deferred until completion of payment of the entire purchase price.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 291, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 24.

6-32-2.
Duties of the seller.

It shall be unlawful for any seller of goods:

To fail to disclose or to misrepresent in any way the store’s policy with reference to a “lay-away” sale;

To represent to a buyer who is purchasing on a “lay-away” sale that the specific goods chosen by the buyer or an exact duplicate of the goods are being laid away for that buyer when that is not a fact;

To fail to disclose to the buyer that the specified goods or their exact duplicate will only be set aside for a certain period of time;

To deliver to the buyer after payments (pursuant to the lay-away sale) are completed, goods that are not identical to, or exact substitutes of, those specified, unless prior approval in writing has been received from the buyer;

To increase the price of the goods specified either by way of increasing the payments or substituting goods that are of a lower quality or price;

To fail to deliver to the buyer, on any date payment is made, a receipt showing the amount and the date of that payment, and, upon request, the balance of payments made up to that date.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 291, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 24.

6-32-3.
Right to cancel — Method — Exception for special-order merchandise.

In addition to any right otherwise to revoke an offer, the buyer may cancel a lay-away plan sale by written notice of cancellation to the seller at the address specified for notice of cancellation provided by the seller not later than midnight ten (10) days following the buyer’s signing the agreement, excluding Sunday and any holiday on which regular mail deliveries are not made. After the ten (10) days the seller may retain no more than ten percent (10%) of the total payments made. The notice of cancellation shall be by personal delivery of registered or certified mail.

This right to cancel a lay-away plan sale shall not apply to special order merchandise, that, for the purposes of this section, means:

Merchandise that is to be custom made and the seller has made either a commitment for its procurement or a substantial beginning of its production; or

Merchandise that substantially differs from the merchandise that the seller ordinarily offers for sale.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 291, § 2; P.L. 1979, ch. 163, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 24.

6-32-4.
Notice required on agreement.

No lay away sale shall be effective unless a written memorandum of the sale is signed and dated by the buyer and unless it conspicuously contains the following directly above the space reserved in the agreement or sales slip for the signature of the buyer:

Notice to buyer:

You are entitled to a copy of this document at the time you sign it.

You may at any time pay off the full unpaid balance due under this agreement, and in so doing you may be entitled to receive a partial rebate of the finance and insurance charges, if any.

You may cancel this agreement provided you notify the seller in person or by registered or certified mail, which shall be given not later than midnight of the tenth calendar day after the day on which the buyer signs the agreement, excluding Sunday and any holiday on which regular mail deliveries are not made.

The seller is not precluded from using his or her own form of notice provided it at least affords the consumer the protection of the statutory notice.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 291, § 2; P.L. 1980, ch. 380, § 1.

6-32-5.
Seller’s obligations on cancellation.

Within thirty (30) days after a lay-away sale has been cancelled, the seller shall tender to the buyer any payments made by the buyer and any note or other evidence of indebtedness. If the down payment includes goods traded in, the goods shall be tendered in substantially as good condition as when received. If the seller fails to tender the goods as provided in this section, the buyer may elect to recover an amount equal to the trade in allowance stated in the agreement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 291, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 24.

6-32-6.
Penalty for violation.

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 291, § 2.